Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Rule 2.30 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.30. A candidate committee shall not accept a


contribution from the authorized committee of a candidate for



Req. No. 2308 Page 1


federal office. A candidate committee shall not make a contribution


to any other candidate for state or federal office.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Rule 2.33 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.33. (A) A. No person shall make, and no limited


committee shall accept, a contribution to any limited committee in


excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in any calendar year,


except as otherwise permitted by law or these Rules. A contribution


to a limited committee that is designated directly or indirectly to


be used for the benefit of a particular candidate or candidates


shall be considered a contribution by the contributor to the


candidate or candidates.


(B) B. No limited committee shall make, and no political party


committee shall accept, a contribution to the political party


committee in excess of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) in any


calendar year.


(C) C. No limited committee or unlimited committee shall make,


and no other limited committee or unlimited committee shall accept,


a contribution to another limited committee or unlimited committee


in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in any calendar year.


(D) D. No limited committee shall make, and no candidate


committee shall accept, a contribution to any candidate committee in



Req. No. 2308 Page 2


excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) prior to a primary


election.


(E) E. No limited committee shall make, and no candidate


committee shall accept, a contribution to any candidate committee of


a candidate whose name will appear on the ballot for a runoff


primary election in excess of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00)


prior to a runoff primary election. Provided, however, after the


primary election a limited committee that has made a contribution of


Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or less to the candidate committee


prior to the primary election may make an additional contribution of


no more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to the candidate


committee prior to the runoff primary election.


(F) F. No limited committee shall make, and no candidate


committee shall accept, a contribution to any candidate committee


prior to a general election in excess of Five Thousand Dollars


($5,000.00). Provided, however, after the primary election or


runoff primary election, whichever is the last for determining a


political party’s nominee, a limited committee that has made a


contribution of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or less to the


candidate committee prior to the primary election or runoff primary


election, or both, may make an additional contribution of no more


than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to the candidate committee


prior to the general election.



Req. No. 2308 Page 3


(G) G. After the general election, a limited committee that has


made no contribution to a candidate or a contribution of less than


Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) in the aggregate under the


provisions of subsections (D) D, (E) E, or (F) F of this Rule may


make an additional contribution or contributions in an amount or


amounts that, aggregated with any prior contributions, do not exceed


Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to that candidate committee.


(H) H. No limited committee shall make a total contribution to


a candidate in excess of the aggregate contribution limits of


subsections (D) D, (E) E, and (F) F of this Rule or in excess of


Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) to the candidate committee of a


candidate who is unopposed for election.


(I) I. For purposes of this section Rule, “contribution” shall


include multiple contributions, the amounts of which shall be


aggregated.


(J) J. A limited committee may make contributions to candidates


for county, municipal, or school district office as permitted by


law.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY Rule 2.35 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.35. Any person not otherwise prohibited by law,


including but not limited to individuals, partnerships, limited


liability companies, corporations and labor unions, may A limited

Req. No. 2308 Page 4


committee, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or


labor union shall not make contributions in any amount to an


unlimited committee organized exclusively for the purpose of making


independent expenditures or electioneering communications. An


unlimited committee organized exclusively for the purpose of making


independent expenditures or electioneering communications may make


contributions in any amount to another unlimited committee organized


exclusively for the purpose of making independent expenditures or


electioneering communications.


SECTION 4. AMENDATORY Rule 2.42 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.42. Contributions to an unlimited political action


committee may be used to make expenditures for independent


expenditures or electioneering communications, for contributions to


another unlimited political action committee organized exclusively


for the purpose of making independent expenditures or electioneering


communications, for operating expenses of the unlimited committee,


or for other purposes not otherwise prohibited by law or these Rules


that further purposes of the committee. “Purposes of the committee”


shall mean purposes expressed in the committee’s bylaws, articles of


organization or similar document or, if there is no such document,


in the committee’s statement of organization as those purposes are


stated prior to the making of an expenditure.

Req. No. 2308 Page 5


SECTION 5. AMENDATORY Rule 2.50 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.50. A. An independent expenditure may be made in any


amount by a political party committee, by a political action


committee, or by any other entity not otherwise prohibited by law or


these Rules from making an independent expenditure; provided, such


committee or entity shall be formed and domiciled in this state.


The treasurer and compliance officer of such committee or entity


shall be residents of this state with a valid street address and


telephone number where such officers may be reached during work


hours.


B. An individual or entity who receives compensation directly


or indirectly from an unlimited political action committee that


makes an independent expenditure on behalf of a candidate or


candidate committee shall not receive compensation directly or


indirectly from such candidate or candidate committee. Receipt of


such compensation shall constitute coordination prohibited by these


Rules.


SECTION 6. AMENDATORY Rule 2.52 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.52. An electioneering communication may be made in any


amount by a political party committee, by a political action

Req. No. 2308 Page 6


committee, or by any other entity not otherwise prohibited by law or


these Rules from making an electioneering communication; provided,


such committee or entity shall be formed and domiciled in this


state. The treasurer and compliance officer of such committee or


entity shall be residents of this state with a valid street address


and telephone number where such officers may be reached during work


hours.


SECTION 7. AMENDATORY Rule 2.79 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.79. A political action committee is any group of two or


more persons that receives contributions or makes expenditures for


any of the following purposes:


(1) 1. Making contributions to candidates or candidate


committees;


(2) making contributions to other political action committees;


(3) making 2. Making independent expenditures;


(4) making 3. Making electioneering communications; or


(5) advocating 4. Advocating the approval or defeat of a state


question.


Unless they choose to be considered as such, family members, as


defined by these Rules, or members of the same household shall not


be considered a political action committee.



Req. No. 2308 Page 7


SECTION 8. AMENDATORY Rule 2.98 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.98. A political action committee registered with the


Federal Election Commission that makes a contribution or


contributions to a candidate or candidates for state office shall


not be required to register or to file a Report of Contributions and


Expenditures with the Ethics Commission, provided the contribution


or contributions are reported to the Federal Election Commission and


are available to the public in the same manner as a political action


committee registered under the laws of this state. The treasurer


and compliance officer of such committee shall be residents of this


state with a valid street address and telephone number where such


officers may be reached during work hours.


SECTION 9. AMENDATORY Rule 2.99 of the Rules of the


Ethics Commission (74 O.S. 2021, Ch. 62, App. I), is amended to read


as follows:


Rule 2.99. A political action committee or an organization


exempt from taxation pursuant to 25 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(4) that


is registered in another state that makes a contribution or


contributions to a candidate or candidates for state office shall


file a Report of Contributions and Expenditures for Non-Oklahoma


Committees but has not registered in this state shall be prohibited



Req. No. 2308 Page 8


from making contributions to candidates for any office in this


state.


SECTION 10. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2308 BLB 1/12/2026 1:24:50 PM







































Req. No. 2308 Page 9